South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) Section 2-13-90 of the S.C. Code authorizes the Legislative Council and the Code Commissioner to contract to be prepared and published under their supervision and direction revised volumes of the Code of Laws. (B) The Legislative Council and the Code Commissioner have determined that Volume 9 is appropriate for revision. (C) Section 2-13-90 of the S.C. Code also provides that the revised volumes must be submitted to the General Assembly for its consideration. SECTION 2.  (A) Revised Volume 9 containing Titles 21-24, South Carolina Code of Laws, is substituted for original Volume 9 which contained Titles 21-24. (B) Revised Volume 9 is adopted as part of the Code of Laws and, to the extent of its contents, is the only general permanent statutory law of the State as of January 1, 2025. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----